Hawaii statutes.
[§421C-30] Voluntary dissolution, etc.
Section 421-21 shall apply to associations formed under this chapter. For the
purposes of this chapter, the term "voting power voting thereon"
means those members present. [L 1982, c 97, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next